Missouri, session 2026, SB1480.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 49, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 49.700, to read as
follows:
49.700. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Sports Franchise Responsibility Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall
mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of economic
development;
(2) "Governing body", the governing body of:
(a) A county, a municipality, or a city not within a
county that owns a public facility; or
(b) Any authority, board, commission, or other
political subdivision created pursuant to state law that
owns a public facility;
(3) "Public facility", any building or facility owned
by:
(a) A county, a municipality, or a city not within a
county; or
(b) Any authority, board, commission, or other
political subdivision created by or pursuant to state law

SB 1480 2
for the purpose of owning or operating public facilities on
behalf of one or more counties or municipalities;
(4) "Reasonably adaptable or usable", capable of being
put to another lawful public or commercial use without
demolition or substantial reconstruction, using
modifications that are:
(a) Consistent with applicable building, fire, safety,
and accessibility codes;
(b) Technically feasible using ordinary construction
methods; and
(c) Economically practicable, taking into account the
physical characteristics of the public facility and
prevailing market conditions, but without regard to the
maximum or highest potential value of the public facility;
(5) "Substantial reconstruction", construction
activity that materially alters the structural framework,
load-bearing elements, or fundamental design of a public
facility, including the removal or replacement of primary
structural components, and that exceeds ordinary renovation,
repair, or reconfiguration undertaken to accommodate a
different tenant or use. "Substantial reconstruction" shall
include work that would customarily require:
(a) Removal of major structural systems; or
(b) Reconfiguration of the facility such that its
essential physical form or functional layout is
fundamentally changed.
3. (1) Any lessee of a public facility that is leased
for the lessee's exclusive or primary use may be liable, as
provided in this section, for a proportionate share of the
reasonable costs of demolition or substantial reconstruction
of such public facility if, upon termination or expiration
of the lease, the public facility is left in a condition

SB 1480 3
that is not reasonably adaptable or usable for another
lawful public or commercial use without demolition or
substantial reconstruction.
(2) Liability under this section shall apply only to
the extent that the condition described in subdivision (1)
of this subsection is attributable to the lessee's exclusive-
use configuration of the public facility or to improvements
installed, constructed, or financed by or on behalf of the
lessee, including tenant-specific improvements financed in
whole or in part with public funds.
(3) The lessee's liability, if any, shall be limited
to a proportionate share of the reasonable and necessary
costs of demolition or substantial reconstruction that are
directly attributable to such exclusive-use configuration or
lessee-installed improvements and shall not include costs
attributable solely to general obsolescence, ordinary wear
and tear, changes in market demand, or redevelopment
decisions unrelated to the lessee's use of the public
facility. The lessee's proportionate share of the
reasonable and necessary costs of demolition or substantial
reconstruction shall not exceed the product of one percent
of the reasonable and necessary costs of demolition or
substantial reconstruction multiplied by the number of years
the lessee has leased the public facility.
4. Upon the request of a governing body, the
department shall, based on substantial evidence and any
independent expert analysis it deems necessary:
(1) Determine whether the public facility is
reasonably adaptable or usable without demolition or
substantial reconstruction;
(2) Identify whether the condition of the public
facility is attributable to:

SB 1480 4
(a) The lessee's exclusive-use configuration;
(b) Lessee-installed improvements; or
(c) Publicly funded lessee-specific improvements;
(3) Determine reasonable costs attributable to the
conditions described in subdivision (2) of this subsection;
and
(4) Allocate a proportional share of costs to the
lessee.
5. Upon the determination made by the department
pursuant to subsection 4 of this section, the department
shall serve upon the governing body and the lessee, by
certified mail with return receipt requested, written
findings of fact, any independent expert reports utilized,
all itemized cost estimates, and an analysis explicitly
attributing causation and costs to the lessee and governing
body. Service shall be deemed complete upon mailing.
6. Within thirty days after service of the
100 determination provided in subsection 5 of this section, a
101 lessee may appeal the department's determination to the
102 administrative hearing commission, which shall hear the
103 appeal as a contested case pursuant to chapter 621. In any
104 such appeal, the department shall bear the burden of proof
105 that the proportional share of costs to the lessee is
106 reasonable, and the administrative hearing commission may
107 affirm, reverse, or modify the department's determination.
✓